Utah statutes.
26-6b-9.   Examination, quarantine, isolation, and treatment costs.

If a local health department obtains approval from the Department of Health, the costs that the local health department would otherwise have to bear for examination, quarantine, isolation, and treatment ordered under the provisions of this chapter shall be paid by the Department of Health to the extent that the individual is unable to pay and that other sources and insurance do not pay.



Amended by Chapter 185, 2006 General Session

